Nebraska, session 109, LB112.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB112 LB112
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 60-171, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-171 For purposes of sections 60-171 to 60-177:
(1) Consumer care has the same meaning as in section 60-1401.10;
(2) (1) Cost of repairs means the estimated or actual retail cost of
parts needed to repair a vehicle plus the cost of labor computed by using
the hourly labor rate and time allocations for repair that are customary
and reasonable. Retail cost of parts and labor rates may be based upon
collision estimating manuals or electronic computer estimating systems
customarily used in the insurance industry;
(3) (2) Flood damaged means damage to a vehicle resulting from being
submerged in water to the point that rising water has reached over the
floorboard, has entered the passenger compartment, and has caused damage
to any electrical, computerized, or mechanical components. Flood damaged
specifically does not apply to a vehicle that an inspection, conducted by
an insurance claim representative or a vehicle repairer, indicates:
(a) Has no electrical, computerized, or mechanical components
damaged by water; or
(b) Had one or more electrical, computerized, or mechanical
components damaged by water and all such damaged components were repaired
or replaced;
(4) (3) Late model vehicle means a vehicle which has (a) a
manufacturer's model year designation of, or later than, the year in
which the vehicle was wrecked, damaged, or destroyed, or any of the six
preceding years or (b)(i) in the case of vehicles other than all-terrain
vehicles, utility-type vehicles, and minibikes, a retail value of more
than ten thousand five hundred dollars until January 1, 2010, and a
retail value of more than ten thousand five hundred dollars increased by
five hundred dollars every five years thereafter or (ii) in the case of
all-terrain vehicles, utility-type vehicles, or minibikes, a retail value
of more than one thousand seven hundred fifty dollars until January 1,
-2-

LB112 LB112
2025 2025
2010, and a retail value of more than one thousand seven hundred fifty
dollars increased by two hundred fifty dollars every five years
thereafter;
(5) (4) Manufacturer buyback means the designation of a vehicle with
an alleged nonconformity when the vehicle (a) has been replaced by a
manufacturer or (b) has been repurchased by a manufacturer as the result
of court judgment, arbitration, or any voluntary agreement entered into
between the manufacturer or its agent and a consumer;
(6) (5) Previously salvaged or rebuilt each mean the designation of
a rebuilt vehicle which was previously required to be issued a salvage
branded certificate of title and which has been inspected as provided in
section 60-146;
(7) (6) Retail value means the actual cash value, fair market value,
or retail value of a vehicle as (a) set forth in a current edition of any
nationally recognized compilation, including automated databases, of
retail values or (b) determined pursuant to a market survey of comparable
vehicles with respect to condition and equipment; and
(8) (7) Salvage means the designation of a vehicle that which is:
(a) A late model vehicle which has been wrecked, damaged, or
destroyed to the extent that the estimated total cost of repair to
rebuild or reconstruct the vehicle to its condition immediately before it
was wrecked, damaged, or destroyed and to restore the vehicle to a
condition for legal operation, meets or exceeds seventy-five percent of
the retail value of the vehicle at the time it was wrecked, damaged, or
destroyed; or
(b) Voluntarily designated by the owner of the vehicle as a salvage
vehicle by obtaining a salvage branded certificate of title, without
respect to the damage to, age of, or value of the vehicle; or .
(c) Deemed a structurally totaled vehicle by a facility that
performs consumer care and by an insurance company that insured the
vehicle at the time it sustained the damage that caused it to be deemed a
-3-

LB112 LB112
2025 2025
structurally totaled vehicle; and
(9)(a) Structurally totaled vehicle means a vehicle totaled due to a
kink or crease in a frame rail, a unibody, or a structural component,
including an engine cradle or a rear differential;
(b) Structurally totaled vehicle does not include a vehicle deemed a
total loss due to hail or cosmetic damage; and
(c) Structurally totaled vehicle does not include a vehicle if the
cost to perform repairs does not exceed seventy-five percent of the
actual cash value of the vehicle.
Sec. 2. Section 60-173, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-173 (1) When an insurance company acquires a salvage vehicle
through payment of a total loss settlement on account of damage or as a
result of a determination that the vehicle is a structurally totaled
vehicle, the company shall obtain the certificate of title from the
owner, surrender such certificate of title to the county treasurer, and
make application for a salvage branded certificate of title which shall
be assigned when the company transfers ownership. An insurer shall take
title to a salvage vehicle for which a total loss settlement is made
unless the owner of the salvage vehicle elects to retain the salvage
vehicle.
(2) If the owner elects to retain the salvage vehicle, the insurance
company shall notify the department of such fact in a format prescribed
by the department. The department shall immediately enter the salvage
brand onto the computerized record of the vehicle. Beginning on the
implementation date designated by the director pursuant to subsection (3)
of section 60-1508, the insurance company shall report electronically to
the department using the electronic reporting system. The insurance
company shall also notify the owner of the owner's responsibility to
comply with this section. The owner shall, within thirty days after the
settlement of the loss, forward the properly endorsed acceptable
-4-

LB112 LB112
2025 2025
certificate of title to the county treasurer in the county designated in
section 60-144. Upon receipt of the certificate of title, the county
treasurer shall issue a salvage branded certificate of title for the
vehicle unless the vehicle has been repaired and inspected as provided in
section 60-146, in which case the county treasurer shall issue a
previously salvaged branded certificate of title for the vehicle.
(3) An insurance company may apply to the department for a salvage
branded certificate of title without obtaining a properly endorsed
certificate of title from the owner or other evidence of ownership as
prescribed by the department if it has been at least thirty days since
the company obtained oral or written acceptance by the owner of an offer
in an amount in settlement of a total loss. The insurance company shall
submit an application form prescribed by the department for a salvage
branded certificate of title accompanied by an affidavit from the
insurance company that it has made at least two written attempts and has
been unable to obtain the proper endorsed certificate of title from the
owner following an oral or written acceptance by the owner of an offer of
an amount in settlement of a total loss and evidence of settlement.
Sec. 3. Original sections 60-171 and 60-173, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-5-